Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,110.12
Examining board; seal; adopt.

The examining board shall adopt and have an official seal, which shall be affixed to all licenses and in-training certificates that are granted by the examining board. The dimensions of the seal shall be as provided in the bylaws.

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 14;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 25.
September 1, 2024